Wisconsin, session 2025, SB1127.
do enact as follows:SB1127,11Section 1. 49.45 (30t) of the statutes is created to read:SB1127,2,4249.45 (30t) Fertility treatments. (a) Subject to par. (b), fertility treatment 3under s. 49.46 (2) (b) 17m. provided to an individual are reimbursable under the 4Medical Assistance program.SB1127,2,115(b) If the department determines that it is unable to implement par. (a) 6without a state plan amendment or waiver of federal law, the department shall 7submit to the federal department of health and human services any state plan 8amendment or waiver of federal law necessary to implement par. (a). The 9department may not pay reimbursement under par. (a) unless any necessary 10amendment or waiver allowing reimbursement under s. 49.46 (2) (b) 17m. is 11approved and in effect or no amendment or waiver is required.SB1127,212Section 2. 49.46 (2) (b) 17m. of the statutes is created to read:SB1127,2,141349.46 (2) (b) 17m. Subject to s. 49.45 (30t), fertility treatments for which 14coverage is required under s. 632.895 (15h).SB1127,315Section 3. 253.18 of the statutes is created to read:SB1127,2,1616253.18 Fertility treatment. (1) Definitions. In this section:SB1127,2,1717(a) “Fertility treatment” includes all of the following:SB1127,2,19181. Preservation of human oocytes, sperm, or embryos for later reproductive 19use.SB1127,3,212. Artificial insemination, including intravaginal insemination, intracervical 2insemination, and intrauterine insemination.SB1127,3,533. Assisted reproductive technology, including in vitro fertilization and other 4treatments or procedures in which reproductive genetic material, such as oocytes, 5sperm, fertilized eggs, and embryos, are handled, when clinically appropriate.SB1127,3,664. Genetic testing of embryos.SB1127,3,875. Medications prescribed or obtained over-the-counter, as indicated for 8fertility.SB1127,3,996. Gamete donation.SB1127,3,12107. Such other information, referrals, treatments, procedures, medications, 11laboratory testing, technologies, and services relating to fertility as the federal 12secretary of health and human services determines appropriate.SB1127,3,1613(b) “Health care provider” means any entity or individual, including any 14physician, nurse practitioner, physician assistant, pharmacist, health care support 15personnel, clinical staff, and any other individual, as determined by the 16department, that meets the following criteria:SB1127,3,19171. Is engaged or seeks to engage in the delivery of fertility treatment, 18including through the provision of evidence-based information, counseling, 19referrals, or items and services that relate to, aid in, or provide fertility treatment.SB1127,3,23202. If required, is licensed, certified, or otherwise authorized or would be so 21licensed, certified, or otherwise authorized but for the fact that the individual or 22entity has provided, is providing, or plans to provide fertility treatment in 23accordance with sub. (2).SB1127,4,21(c) “Health insurance issuer” has the meaning given in section 2791 (b) of the 2Public Health Service Act, 42 USC 300gg-91 (b) (2).SB1127,4,53(d) “Manufacturer” means the manufacturer of a drug or device approved, 4cleared, authorized, or licensed under 21 USC 355, 360 (k), 360c (f) (2), or 360e or 42 5USC 262, or otherwise legally marketed.SB1127,4,86(e) “Widely accepted and evidence-based medical standards of care” means 7any medical services, procedures, and practices that are in accordance with the 8guidelines of the American Society for Reproductive Medicine.SB1127,4,119(2) Fertility treatment rights. (a) Individual rights. An individual has a 10statutory right under this section, without prohibition, limitation, interference, or 11impediment, to do any of the following:SB1127,4,13121. Receive fertility treatment from a health care provider in accordance with 13widely accepted and evidence-based medical standards of care.SB1127,4,16142. Continue or complete an ongoing fertility treatment previously initiated by 15a health care provider in accordance with widely accepted and evidence-based 16medical standards of care.SB1127,4,19173. Make decisions and arrangements regarding the donation, testing, use, 18storage, or disposition of reproductive genetic material, such as oocytes, sperm, 19fertilized eggs, and embryos.SB1127,4,23204. Establish contractual agreements with a health care provider relating to 21the health care provider’s services in handling, testing, storing, shipping, and 22disposing of the individual’s reproductive genetic material in accordance with 23widely accepted and evidence-based medical standards of care.SB1127,5,224(b) Health care provider rights. A health care provider has a statutory right 1under this section, without prohibition, limitation, interference, or impediment, to 2all of the following:SB1127,5,431. Provide, or assist with the provision of, fertility treatment provided in 4accordance with widely accepted and evidence-based medical standards of care.SB1127,5,752. Continue or complete the provision of, or assistance with, fertility 6treatment that was lawful when commenced and is provided in accordance with 7widely accepted and evidence-based medical standards of care.SB1127,5,1083. Provide for, or assist with, the testing, use, storage, or disposition of 9reproductive genetic material, such as oocytes, sperm, fertilized eggs, and embryos, 10in accordance with widely accepted and evidence-based medical standards of care.SB1127,5,13114. Establish contractual agreements with individuals or manufacturers 12relating to the health care provider’s services in handling, testing, storing, 13shipping, and disposing of the individual’s reproductive genetic material.SB1127,5,1714(c) Health insurance issuer rights. A health insurance issuer has a statutory 15right under this section, without prohibition, limitation, interference, or 16impediment, to cover the provision of fertility treatment provided in accordance 17with widely accepted and evidence-based medical standards of care.SB1127,5,2418(d) Manufacturer rights. A manufacturer of a drug or device that is approved, 19cleared, authorized, or licensed under 21 USC 355, 360 (k), 360c (f) (2), or 360e or 42 20USC 262 or otherwise legally marketed and intended for use in the provision of 21fertility treatment, including the storage or transport of oocytes, gametes, fertilized 22eggs, and embryos, has a statutory right under this section, without prohibition, 23limitation, interference, or impediment to manufacture, import, market, sell, and 24distribute such drug or device.SB1127,6,31(e) Enforcement and private right of action. 1. The attorney general may 2commence a civil action or proceeding on behalf of any person in this state whose 3rights are adversely affected by an alleged violation of pars. (a) to (d).SB1127,6,542. An individual or entity adversely affected by an alleged violation of pars. (a) 5to (d) may commence a civil action for a violation under pars. (a) to (d). Down Down /2025/related/proposals/sb1127 true proposaltext /2025/related/proposals/sb1127 proposaltext/2025/REG/SB1127 proposaltext/2025/REG/SB1127 section true Menu»2025»Related Documents»Proposal Text»SB1127: Bill Text × Details for PDF view Link (Permanent link) Bookmark this location View toggle Go to top of document Search in this chapter Search in this section Search in this agency Search in this chapter group Search in this chapter Search in this section Cross references for section Acts affecting this section References to this 1970 Statutes Annotations Appellate Court Citations Administrative Code Index Reference lines Clear highlighting